Illinois, session 104th, HB3660.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Amber 5Alert Plus Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "Amber Alert 7Plus" means a notification system, activated under subsection 8(a) of Section 10, designed to issue and coordinate alerts 9with respect to Black youth, including young women and girls, 10who are reported missing under unexplained or suspicious 11circumstances, who are reported missing and are at risk, who 12are reported missing and are developmentally disabled or 13cognitively impaired, or who have been abducted. 14    Section 10. Management and security of the Fund.15    (a) If a person is reported missing or abducted to a law 16enforcement agency and that agency determines that factors 17considered under subsection (e) justify an Amber Alert Plus, 18the law enforcement agency may request the Illinois State 19Police to activate an Amber Alert Plus in a system created and 20maintained by the Illinois State Police. If the Director of 21the Illinois State Police, or an individual or division 22designated by the Director, concurs that the factors   HB3660- 2 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1considered under subsection (e) justify an Amber Alert Plus, 2the Illinois State Police may activate an Amber Alert Plus 3within the appropriate geographical area requested by the 4investigating law enforcement agency.5    (b) Radio, television, cable, satellite, and social media 6systems are encouraged, but not required, to cooperate with 7disseminating the Amber Alert Plus or the information 8contained in an Amber Alert Plus.9    (c) Upon activation of an Amber Alert Plus, the Illinois 10State Police may assist the investigating law enforcement 11agency by issuing other alerts, an electronic flyer, or 12changeable message signs in compliance with subsection (d).13    (d) Upon activation of an Amber Alert Plus, the Illinois 14State Police may use a changeable message sign if both of the 15following conditions are met: 16        (1) a law enforcement agency determines that a vehicle 17    may be involved in the missing person incident; and18        (2) specific identifying information about the vehicle 19    is available for public dissemination.20    (e) A law enforcement agency may request that an Amber 21Alert Plus be activated if that agency determines that an 22Amber Alert Plus would be an effective tool in the 23investigation of missing or abducted Black youth, including 24young women or girls. The law enforcement agency may consider 25the following factors to make that determination:26        (1) The missing person is age 12 to 25 years of age.  HB3660- 3 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1        (2) The missing person suffers from a mental or 2    physical disability.3        (3) The person is missing under circumstances that 4    indicate any of the following:5            (A) The missing person's physical safety may be 6        endangered. The missing person's physical safety is 7        presumed to be endangered, unless there is evidence to 8        the contrary, if the person is 18 or under.9            (B) The missing person may be subject to 10        trafficking.11        (4) The person has gone missing under unexplained or 12    suspicious circumstances.13        (5) The person is in danger because of age, health, 14    mental or physical disability, or environment or weather 15    conditions, that the person is in the company of a 16    potentially dangerous person, or that there are other 17    factors indicating that the person may be in peril.18        (6) If the investigating law enforcement agency has 19    utilized available local resources.20        (7) If there is information available that, if 21    disseminated to the public, could assist in the safe 22    recovery of the missing person. 23    Section 90. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 24Section 15 as follows:   HB3660- 4 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1    (230 ILCS 40/15)2    Sec. 15. Minimum requirements for licensing and 3registration. Every video gaming terminal offered for play 4shall first be tested and approved pursuant to the rules of the 5Board, and each video gaming terminal offered in this State 6for play shall conform to an approved model. For the 7examination of video gaming machines and associated equipment 8as required by this Section, the Board shall utilize the 9services of independent outside testing laboratories that have 10been accredited in accordance with ISO/IEC 17025 by an 11accreditation body that is a signatory to the International 12Laboratory Accreditation Cooperation Mutual Recognition 13Agreement signifying they are qualified to perform such 14examinations. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, the 15Board shall consider the licensing of independent outside 16testing laboratory applicants in accordance with procedures 17established by the Board by rule. The Board shall not withhold 18its approval of an independent outside testing laboratory 19license applicant that has been accredited as required by this 20Section and is licensed in gaming jurisdictions comparable to 21Illinois. Upon the finalization of required rules, the Board 22shall license independent testing laboratories and accept the 23test reports of any licensed testing laboratory of the video 24gaming machine's or associated equipment manufacturer's 25choice, notwithstanding the existence of contracts between the 26Board and any independent testing laboratory. Every video   HB3660- 5 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1gaming terminal offered in this State for play must meet 2minimum standards approved by the Board. Each approved model 3shall, at a minimum, meet the following criteria: 4        (1) It must conform to all requirements of federal law 5    and regulations, including FCC Class A Emissions 6    Standards. 7        (2) It must theoretically pay out a mathematically 8    demonstrable percentage during the expected lifetime of 9    the machine of all amounts played, which must not be less 10    than 80%. The Board shall establish a maximum payout 11    percentage for approved models by rule. Video gaming 12    terminals that may be affected by skill must meet this 13    standard when using a method of play that will provide the 14    greatest return to the player over a period of continuous 15    play. 16        (3) It must use a random selection process to 17    determine the outcome of each play of a game. The random 18    selection process must meet 99% confidence limits using a 19    standard chi-squared test for (randomness) goodness of 20    fit. 21        (4) It must display an accurate representation of the 22    game outcome. 23        (5) It must not automatically alter pay tables or any 24    function of the video gaming terminal based on internal 25    computation of hold percentage or have any means of 26    manipulation that affects the random selection process or   HB3660- 6 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1    probabilities of winning a game. 2        (6) It must not be adversely affected by static 3    discharge or other electromagnetic interference. 4        (7) It must be capable of detecting and displaying the 5    following conditions during idle states or on demand: 6    power reset; door open; and door just closed. 7        (8) It must have the capacity to display complete play 8    history (outcome, intermediate play steps, credits 9    available, bets placed, credits paid, and credits cashed 10    out) for the most recent game played and 10 games prior 11    thereto. 12        (9) The theoretical payback percentage of a video 13    gaming terminal must not be capable of being changed 14    without making a hardware or software change in the video 15    gaming terminal, either on site or via the central 16    communications system. 17        (10) Video gaming terminals must be designed so that 18    replacement of parts or modules required for normal 19    maintenance does not necessitate replacement of the 20    electromechanical meters. 21        (11) It must have nonresettable meters housed in a 22    locked area of the terminal that keep a permanent record 23    of all cash inserted into the machine, all winnings made 24    by the terminal printer, credits played in for video 25    gaming terminals, and credits won by video gaming players. 26    The video gaming terminal must provide the means for   HB3660- 7 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1    on-demand display of stored information as determined by 2    the Board. 3        (12) Electronically stored meter information required 4    by this Section must be preserved for a minimum of 180 days 5    after a power loss to the service. 6        (13) It must have one or more mechanisms that accept 7    cash in the form of bills. The mechanisms shall be 8    designed to prevent obtaining credits without paying by 9    stringing, slamming, drilling, or other means. If such 10    attempts at physical tampering are made, the video gaming 11    terminal shall suspend itself from operating until reset. 12        (14) It shall have accounting software that keeps an 13    electronic record which includes, but is not limited to, 14    the following: total cash inserted into the video gaming 15    terminal; the value of winning tickets claimed by players; 16    the total credits played; the total credits awarded by a 17    video gaming terminal; and pay back percentage credited to 18    players of each video game. 19        (15) It shall be linked by a central communications 20    system to provide auditing program information as approved 21    by the Board. The central communications system shall use 22    a standard industry protocol, as defined by the Gaming 23    Standards Association, and shall have the functionality to 24    enable the Board or its designee to activate or deactivate 25    individual gaming devices from the central communications 26    system. In no event may the communications system approved   HB3660- 8 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1    by the Board limit participation to only one manufacturer 2    of video gaming terminals by either the cost in 3    implementing the necessary program modifications to 4    communicate or the inability to communicate with the 5    central communications system. 6        (16) The Board, in its discretion, may require video 7    gaming terminals to display Amber Alert or Amber Alert 8    Plus messages if the Board makes a finding that it would be 9    economically and technically feasible and pose no risk to 10    the integrity and security of the central communications 11    system and video gaming terminals.12    Licensed terminal handlers shall have access to video 13gaming terminals, including, but not limited to, logic door 14access, without the physical presence or supervision of the 15Board or its agent to perform, in coordination with and with 16project approval from the central communication system 17provider: 18        (i) the clearing of the random access memory and 19    reprogramming of the video gaming terminal; 20        (ii) the installation of new video gaming terminal 21    software and software upgrades that have been approved by 22    the Board; 23        (iii) the placement, connection to the central 24    communication system, and go-live operation of video 25    gaming terminals at a licensed establishment, licensed 26    truck stop establishment, licensed large truck stop   HB3660- 9 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1    establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or 2    licensed veterans establishment; 3        (iv) the repair and maintenance of a video gaming 4    terminal located at a licensed establishment, licensed 5    truck stop establishment, licensed large truck stop 6    establishment, licensed fraternal establishment, or 7    licensed veterans establishment, including, but not 8    limited to, the replacement of the video gaming terminal 9    with a new video gaming terminal; 10        (v) the temporary movement, disconnection, 11    replacement, and reconnection of video gaming terminals to 12    allow for physical improvements and repairs at a licensed 13    establishment, licensed truck stop establishment, licensed 14    large truck stop establishment, licensed fraternal 15    establishment, or licensed veterans establishment, such as 16    replacement of flooring, interior repairs, and other 17    similar activities; and 18        (vi) such other functions as the Board may otherwise 19    authorize. 20    The Board shall, at a licensed terminal operator's 21expense, cause all keys and other required devices to be 22provided to a terminal operator necessary to allow the 23licensed terminal handler access to the logic door to the 24terminal operator's video gaming terminals. 25    The Board may adopt rules to establish additional criteria 26to preserve the integrity and security of video gaming in this   HB3660- 10 -LRB104 06198 RTM 16233 b1State. The central communications system vendor may be 2licensed as a video gaming terminal manufacturer or a video 3gaming terminal distributor, or both, but in no event shall 4the central communications system vendor be licensed as a 5video gaming terminal operator. 6    The Board shall not permit the development of information 7or the use by any licensee of gaming device or individual game 8performance data. Nothing in this Act shall inhibit or 9prohibit the Board from the use of gaming device or individual 10game performance data in its regulatory duties. The Board 11shall adopt rules to ensure that all licensees are treated and 12all licensees act in a non-discriminatory manner and develop 13processes and penalties to enforce those rules. 14(Source: P.A. 101-31, eff. 6-28-19.)